Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1112.01
2021 allocation, defined.

2021 allocation means a monetary amount of qualified equity investments to be awarded by the Tax Commissioner after the 2021 federal notice under the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act that results in a maximum tax credit utilization in any fiscal year of no more than fifteen million dollars of new tax credits.

Laws 2021, LB682, § 5.